evenkiCurMorph/evenki_rus_nouns.lexc
!!!evenki.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl +Nom +Acc ch sh zh d' n' s' ng type1 type2 type3

LEXICON Root

Noun;
NounIrregular;
Verb;
Adjective;
Adverb;
Numeral;

LEXICON Nindps

+N:0   Nnum;
+N+Indps:^ng   Nnum;

!!!DERIVATIONAL SUFFIXES
+Atten:^kAn Nindps;
+Eqt:^gAchin Nindps;

LEXICON Nnum

+Sg:0   NCase;
+Pl:^l   NCase;

LEXICON NCase

+Nom:0   NPoss;
+Acc:^wA   NPoss;
+Accin:^jA   NPoss;
+Datloc:^du   NPoss;
+Instr:^t   NPoss;
+Locall:^lA   NPoss;
+All:^tki   NPoss;
+Prol:^li   NPoss;
+Abl:^duk   NPoss;
+Ela:^git   NPoss;
+AllLoc:^glA   NPoss;
+AllPro:^gli   NPoss;

LEXICON NPoss
:0 #;
+Ps1Sg:^w #;
+Ps2Sg:^s #;
+Ps3Sg:^n #;
+Ps1Pl(EXCL):^wun #;
+Ps1Pl(INCL):^T #;
+Ps2Pl:^sun #;
+Ps3Pl:^tin #;
+Rfl:^wi #;
+Rfl.Pl:^wAr #;

LEXICON Adj
+Adj:0   Nnum;

LEXICON Adv
+Adv:0   #;

LEXICON Num
+Num:0   #;


LEXICON Vvoice
+V:0 VAspect;
+V+Pass:^w VAspect;
+V+Comit:^ldi VAspect;
+V+Recip:^MAt VAspect;
+V+Caus:^wkAn VAspect;
+V+Decaus:^rgA VAspect;
+V+Tr:^w VAspect;

LEXICON VAspect
:0 VSubaspect;
+Ipfv:^d'A VSubaspect;

LEXICON VSubaspect
:0 VFiniteNonfinite;
+Incep:^sin VSubaspect;
#so that the rules concerning l won't apply
+Inch:^L VSubaspect;
+Dsprs:^ktA VSubaspect;
+Dur:^t VSubaspect;
+Hab:^ngnA VSubaspect;
+Iter:^wAt VSubaspect;
+QA:^mAlchA VSubaspect;
+Stat:^chA VSubaspect;
+Des:^mu VSubaspect;
+Con:^ssA VSubaspect;



LEXICON VFiniteNonfinite
:0 VMood;
:0 VParticiple;
:0 VConverb;


LEXICON VMood
:0 VIndicTense;
:0 VImperTense;
+Deb:^mAchin #;
+Cond:^mchA VCondPers;
+Evid:^rkA VEvidPersRka;
+Evid:^nA VEvidPersNa;
+EvidHab:^rgu VEvidPersRgu;

LEXICON VParticiple
+Psim:^ri Nnum;
+Ppf:^nA Pnum;
+Pant:^chA Nnum;
+Phab:^wki Nnum;
+Ppost:^d'AngA Nnum;
+Pdeb:^mAchin Nnum;
+Pdeb:^ngAt Nnum;
+Pimmfut:^ltAk Nnum;
+Pfict:^ksAn Nnum;
+Pimpdeb:^wkA Nnum;
+Pneg:^rA #;

LEXICON VConverb
+Cvsim:^nA Cnum;
+Cvant:^ksA Cnum;
+Cvnsim:^kAnim Cnum;
+Cvpost:^mnen Cnum;
+Cvcond:^mi Cnum;
+Cvcon:^mnek Cnum;

+Cvsim:^ngAsi NPoss;
+Cvant:^chAlA NPoss;
+Cvpost:^dAlA NPoss;
+Cvcond:^rAk CPoss;
+Cvcon:^d'AnmA NPoss;
+Cvpurp:^dA NPoss;
+Cvbd:^d'AnmA CPoss;
+Cvint:^wunA NPoss;
+Cvlim:^d'Ali NPoss;


LEXICON Cnum
+Sg:0   #;
+Pl:^l   #;

LEXICON CPoss
+Ps1Sg:^w #;
+Ps2Sg:^s #;
+Ps3Sg:^n #;
+Ps1Pl(EXCL):^wun #;
+Ps1Pl(INCL):^T #;
+Ps2Pl:^sun #;
+Ps3Pl:^tin #;

LEXICON Pnum

+Sg:0   PCase;
+Pl:^l   PCase;

LEXICON PCase

+Nom:0   PPoss;
+Acc:^wA   PPoss;
+Accin:^jA   PPoss;
+Datloc:^du   PPoss;
+Instr:^t   PPoss;
+Locall:^lA   PPoss;
+All:^tki   PPoss;
+Prol:^li   PPoss;
+Abl:^duk   PPoss;
+Ela:^git   PPoss;
+AllLoc:^glA   PPoss;
+AllPro:^gli   PPoss;

LEXICON PPoss
+Ps1Sg:^w #;
+Ps2Sg:^s #;
+Ps3Sg:^n #;
+Ps1Pl(EXCL):^wun #;
+Ps1Pl(INCL):^T #;
+Ps2Pl:^sun #;
+Ps3Pl:^tin #;
+Rfl:^wi #;
+Rfl.Pl:^wAr #;





LEXICON VIndicTense
+Pst:^chA VPossPersNum;
+Pstiter:^ngki VPossPersNum;
+Fut:^d'AngA VPossPersNum;
+Futnear:^d'al VFutnearPersNum;
+Futcnt:^d'A VFutcntPersNum;
+Nfut:0 VNFutNoNfutSuffix;
+Nfut:^rA VNFutPersNum;



LEXICON VPossPersNum
+1Sg:^w #;
+2Sg:^s #;
+3Sg:^n #;
+1Pl(EXCL):^wun #;
+1Pl(INCL):^t #;
+1Pl(INCL):^p #;
+2Pl:^sun #;
+3Pl:^tin #;

LEXICON VFutcntPersNum
+1Sg:^m #;
+2Sg:^nni #;
+3Sg:^n #;
+1Pl(EXCL):^rAw #;
+1Pl(INCL):^p #;
+1Pl(INCL):^t #;
+2Pl:^s #;
+3Pl:^ra #;

LEXICON VFutnearPersNum
+1Sg:^m #;
+2Sg:^nni #;
+3Sg:^rAn #;
+1Pl(EXCL):^rAw #;
+1Pl(INCL):^rAp #;
+1Pl(INCL):^rAt #;
+2Pl:^rAs #;
+3Pl:^rA #;



LEXICON VNFutNoNfutSuffix
+1Sg:^m #;
+2Sg:^nni #;

LEXICON VNFutPersNum
+1Pl(EXCL):^w #;
+1Pl(INCL):^p #;
+1Pl(INCL):^t #;
+2Pl:^s #;
+3Sg:^n #;
+3Pl:0 #;

LEXICON VNFutAll
VNFutNoNfutSuffix;
VNFutPersNum;


LEXICON VImperTense
:0 VImper;
+ImperDist:^ngnA VImperDist13;
+ImperDist:^dA VImperDist2;

LEXICON VImper
+Imper1Sg:^ktA #;
+Imper2Sg:^kAl #;
+Imper3Sg:^gin #;
+Imper1Pl(EXCL):^kwun #;
+Imper1Pl(INCL):^gAt #;
+Imper2Pl:^kAllu #;
+Imper3Pl:^ktin #;

LEXICON VImperDist13
+1Sg:^m #;
+3Sg:^n #;
+1Pl(EXCL):^wun #;
+1Pl(INCL):^t #;
+3Pl:^tin #;

LEXICON VImperDist2
+2Sg:^wi #;
+2Pl:^wAr #;

LEXICON VCondPers
+1Sg:^w #;
+2Sg:^s #;
+3Sg:0 #;
+1Pl(EXCL):^lwun #;
+1Pl(INCL):^t #;
+1Pl(INCL):^p #;
+2Pl:^lsun #;
+3Pl:^ltin #;

LEXICON VEvidPersRka
+1Sg:^w #;
+2Sg:^s #;
+3Sg:0 #;
+1Pl(EXCL):^wun #;
+1Pl(INCL):^t #;
+1Pl(INCL):^p #;
+2Pl:^sun #;
+3Pl:^tin #;
+3Pl:^l #;

LEXICON VEvidPersRgu
+1Sg:^m #;
+2Sg:^nni #;
+3Sg:^n #;
+1Pl(EXCL):^rAw #;
+1Pl(EXCL):^wun #;
+1Pl(INCL):^p #;
+1Pl(INCL):^t #;
+2Pl:^s #;
+2Pl:^sun #;
+3Pl:^rA #;

LEXICON VEvidPersNa
+1Sg:^m #;
+2Sg:^nni #;
+3Sg:^n #;
+1Pl(EXCL):^rAw #;
+1Pl(INCL):^p #;
+1Pl(INCL):^t #;
+2Pl:^s #;
+2Pl:^sun #;
+3Pl:^rA #;


LEXICON NounIrregular

bi_быть+V+Nfut:bisi VNFutAll;
bi_быть+V+Cvcond:bisik CPoss;
bi_быть+V+Psim:bisi Nnum;
bi_быть+V+Pneg:bisi #;

ō_стать+V+Nfut:oda VNFutAll;
ō_стать+V+Cvcond:odak CPoss;
ō_стать+V+Pneg:oda #;

ga_взять+V+Nfut:gada VNFutAll;
ga_взять+V+Cvcond:gadak CPoss;
ga_взять+V+Pneg:gada #;


bū_дать+V+Nfut:buda VNFutAll;
bū_дать+V+Cvcond:budak CPoss;
bū_дать+V+Pneg:buda #;

LEXICON Noun
arendator_арендатор:arendator Nindps;
d'angan_бедность:d'angan Nindps;
naptaka_блюдечко:naptaka Nindps;
bratstwo_братство:bratstwo Nindps;
buhgalt'er_бухгалтер:buhgalt'er Nindps;
wet'erinar_ветеринар:wet'erinar Nindps;
salgin_воздух:salgin Nindps;
bulen_враг:bulen Nindps;
mojon_вышина:mojon Nindps;
godowschina_годовщина:godowschina Nindps;
alagūrī_грамота:alaguri Nindps;
hangas_деверь:hangas Nindps;
wāne_добыча:wane Nindps;
sangār_дупло:sangar Nindps;
bikīt_жильё:bikittype2 Nindps;
hāld'etchene_замешательство:hald'etchene Nindps;
nirgi_звук:nirgi Nindps;
sinmachin_избрание:sinmachin Nindps;
bajanmukā_интерес:bajanmuka Nindps;
kaps'ul_капсюль:kaps'ul Nindps;
ulēkkīmnī_клеветник:ulekkimni Nindps;
emke_колыбель:emke Nindps;
isākte_короста:isakte Nindps;
dasptin_кровля:dasptin Nindps;
d'eptilē_кушанье:d'eptile Nindps;
sulakī_лиса:sulaki Nindps;
bakaja_медведь:bakaja Nindps;
d'oroko_мошенник:d'oroko Nindps;
simutkān_неразговорчивый:simutkantype2 Nindps;
korgold'un_олово:korgold'un Nindps;
amā_папа:ama Nindps;
kure_плетень:kure Nindps;
urigden_полынья:urigden Nindps;
priroda_природа:priroda Nindps;
sukchan_разгром:sukchan Nindps;
ichin_рычание:ichin Nindps;
dingnīl̄mētkīt_скачки:dingnilmetkit Nindps;
n'amā_сотня:n'ama Nindps;
upchun_схватка:upchun Nindps;
amar_тыл:amar Nindps;
umkī_филин:umki Nindps;
samān_шаман:samantype2 Nindps;
LEXICON Verb
sodom_бушевать:sodomtype3 Vvoice;
uchīsin_включить:uchisintype2 Vvoice;
ajūsiw_восстановиться:ajusiwtype1 Vvoice;
jūw_вывести:juwtype2 Vvoice;
degil_вылетать:degiltype2 Vvoice;
gūn_высказать:guntype2 Vvoice;
aldin_вязнуть:aldin Vvoice;
tewul_догнать:tewultype2 Vvoice;
ewīwkēn_забавлять:ewiwkentype2 Vvoice;
wā_загубить:watype2 Vvoice;
buchī_закоптить:buchi Vvoice;
sōmiw_запираться:somiwtype1 Vvoice;
hawatal_засуетиться:hawatal Vvoice;
igiche_звенеть:igiche Vvoice;
murekē_исколесить:mureke Vvoice;
sangn'anmu_клубиться:sangn'anmutype1 Vvoice;
adulā_любоваться:adulatype2 Vvoice;
tewu_наваливать:tewutype2 Vvoice;
takus_наладить:takus Vvoice;
tatigā_научить:tatigatype2 Vvoice;
turūche_облокотиться:turuche Vvoice;
taptiras_обтереть:taptiras Vvoice;
murukēsin_окружать:murukesintype2 Vvoice;
ō_основать:otype1 Vvoice;
ulta_отзываться:ultatype1 Vvoice;
tīn_отпустить:tintype2 Vvoice;
dawda_пасть:dawda Vvoice;
ung_переправить:ungtype2 Vvoice;
ted'ē_поверить:ted'etype2 Vvoice;
chokorcho_подмигивать:chokorchotype3 Vvoice;
singarga_пожелтеть:singarga Vvoice;
mengkumul_понюхать:mengkumul Vvoice;
sāl_постичь:saltype2 Vvoice;
ulēkkīsse_предать:ulekkisse Vvoice;
tikachil_прицелиться:tikachil Vvoice;
horolīsinmukān_пустить:horolisinmukan Vvoice;
sektew_раскинуться:sektewtype2 Vvoice;
songolkōkutcha_рыдать:songolkokutcha Vvoice;
uremkītche_сличать:uremkitche Vvoice;
mukussed'e_спорить:mukussed'e Vvoice;
iserīmū_тошнить:iserimutype2 Vvoice;
amin_успеть:amintype1 Vvoice;
LEXICON Adjective
amerikanskaj_американский:amerikanskaj Adj;
kakira_бедный:kakira Adj;
d'alga_безумный:d'alga Adj;
angad'akān_беспризорный:angad'akan Adj;
gilbeme_блестящий:gilbeme Adj;
hawā_бойкий:hawa Adj;
egdi_большой:egdi Adj;
suruk_быстрый:suruk Adj;
ejetcherī_взыскательный:ejetcheri Adj;
ws'emīrnaj_всемирный:ws'emirnaj Adj;
gimnastikadi_гимнастический:gimnastikadi Adj;
gorodti_городской:gorodti Adj;
d'ūr-d'ārichī_двадцатилетний:d'ur-d'arichi Adj;
gorulī_долгий:goruli Adj;
hekūpchu_жаркий:hekupchu Adj;
zakōnodat'elnej_законодательный:zakonodat'elnej Adj;
īd'erī_звучащий:id'eri Adj;
hedeke_излишний:hedeke Adj;
italjanskej_итальянский:italjanskej Adj;
giwchēnngi_козий:giwchenngi Adj;
mujedi_крайний:mujedi Adj;
urumkūn_куцый:urumkun Adj;
taraka_лысый:taraka Adj;
arbakūn_мелкий:arbakun Adj;
hegdimeme_монументальный:hegdimeme Adj;
ted'ēmeme_настоящий:ted'ememe Adj;
sēnngānmēnni_неповоротливый:sennganmenni Adj;
elekeskēn_новый:elekesken Adj;
d'eltume_острый:d'eltume Adj;
kaptakān_плоский:kaptakan Adj;
heleke_посторонний:heleke Adj;
jadun_прозрачный:jadun Adj;
awaditikin_разный:awaditikin Adj;
īmēkin_свежий:imekin Adj;
torgon_скупой:torgon Adj;
tild'erī_сознательный:tild'eri Adj;
semkechē_стёртый:semkeche Adj;
singtirime_тихий:singtirime Adj;
tenek_тупоумный:tenek Adj;
mekcherēche_умерший:mekchereche Adj;
inginīpchu_холодный:inginipchu Adj;
medekēs_чуткий:medekes Adj;
LEXICON Adverb
dāgmet_вброд:dagmet Adv;
d'ūrē_вдвое:d'ure Adv;
jong_вдруг:jong Adv;
ugmat_верхом:ugmat Adv;
lungur_вечером:lungur Adv;
elekes_вначале:elekes Adv;
gēptit_во-вторых:geptit Adv;
elēmetwi_вовсю:elemetwi Adv;
elekesiptit_впервые:elekesiptit Adv;
d'ulēskī_впредь:d'uleski Adv;
ēlasa-dā_всегда:elasa-da Adv;
albintikī_вширь:albintiki Adv;
nonojo_давно:nonojo Adv;
elekin_довольно:elekin Adv;
eredelēwi_досыта:eredelewi Adv;
gorokōndū_задолго:gorokondu Adv;
gorogit_издалека:gorogit Adv;
ōn-mal_как-нибудь:on-mal Adv;
irtikī_куда:irtiki Adv;
umne-de_мигом:umne-de Adv;
ugīskī_наверх:ugiski Adv;
amaskī_назад:amaski Adv;
antikī_направо:antiki Adv;
darandūn_наряду:darandun Adv;
tigitche_настороже:tigitche Adv;
adikun_немного:adikun Adv;
nekundimer_ниже:nekundimer Adv;
umnēje_однажды:umneje Adv;
irgittēneduk_отовсюду:irgitteneduk Adv;
sōt_очень:sot Adv;
daragū_подле:daragu Adv;
hitekle_понапрасну:hitekle Adv;
tikkēn_попросту:tikken Adv;
amargūt_потом:amargut Adv;
badikir_рано:badikir Adv;
oldondū_рядом:oldondu Adv;
amardū_сзади:amardu Adv;
amardū_следом:amardu Adv;
elekes_сперва:elekes Adv;
tikēn-dē_также:tiken-de Adv;
telinngē_тотчас:telinnge Adv;
ajat_хорошо:ajat Adv;
LEXICON Numeral
d'āpkund'āleke_восемнадцать:d'apkund'aleke Num;
d'ān-d'apkun_восемнадцать:d'an-d'apkun Num;
d'apkunngī_восемьдесят:d'apkunngi Num;
d'apkun-d'ār_восемьдесят:d'apkun-d'ar Num;
d'apkun-n'amadil_восемьсот:d'apkun-n'amadil Num;
d'apkītin_восьмой:d'apkitin Num;
d'apkiwugda_восьмой:d'apkiwugda Num;
gē_второй:ge Num;
d'ūr-d'agītin_двадцатый:d'ur-d'agitin Num;
oriwug-da_двадцатый:oriwug-da Num;
orini_двадцать:orini Num;
d'ūrd'āleke_двенадцать:d'urd'aleke Num;
d'ūrn'amādil_двести:d'urn'amadil Num;
d'ūkre_двое:d'ukre Num;
d'ūkche_двое:d'ukche Num;
jeginngi_девяносто:jeginngi Num;
jegin-n'amādil_девятьсот:jegin-n'amadil Num;
d'ān-umūkēnngī_одиннадцатый:d'an-umukenngi Num;
umūkēnd'ā_одиннадцать:umukend'a Num;
d'an-tunngītin_пятнадцатый:d'an-tunngitin Num;
tunngad'alekī_пятнадцать:tunngad'aleki Num;
tunngītin_пятый:tunngitin Num;
nadīpti_седьмой:nadipti Num;
nadītin_седьмой:naditin Num;
d'ān-nadītin_семнадцатый:d'an-naditin Num;
d'ān-nadan_семнадцать:d'an-nadan Num;
digingiwugda_сороковой:digingiwugda Num;
n'amādi_сто:n'amadi Num;
ilītin_третий:ilitin Num;
ilan_три:ilan Num;
guchin_тридцать:guchin Num;
iland'āleke_тринадцать:iland'aleke Num;
ilan-n'amādīl_триста:ilan-n'amadil Num;
dingnī_четверо:dingni Num;
digīwugde_четвёртый:digiwugde Num;
digin-n'amādīl_четыреста:digin-n'amadil Num;
dān-digin_четырнадцать:dan-digin Num;
digin-n'amādīgī_четырёхсотый:digin-n'amadigi Num;
n'ungun-d'āgī_шестидесятый:n'ungun-d'agi Num;
d'ān-n'ungun_шестнадцать:d'an-n'ungun Num;
n'ungīpti_шестой:n'ungipti Num;
n'ungīwugda_шестой:n'ungiwugda Num;
